District of Columbia statutes.
16-1367

Delivery of possession.

Where possession has not been awarded pursuant to a declaration of taking, and the adjudged compensation has been paid into the registry as directed by the judgment of the court and a certified copy of the judgment, with a certificate of the clerk of the court showing the payment, has been served upon the person in possession of the property, he shall, upon demand, deliver possession thereof to the plaintiff. If possession is not delivered when so demanded, the plaintiff may apply to the court without notice, unless the court requires notice to be given, for a writ of assistance, and the court, upon proof of the service of the copy of the final order or judgment and certificate of the clerk showing payment as referred to in this section, shall thereupon cause the writ to be issued, which shall be executed in the same manner as when issued in other cases for the delivery of possession of real property.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 581, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1367.
1973 Ed., § 16-1367.